Maryland, session 2026, SB0746.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–107.
(a) (1) Pending an investigatory, administrative charging committee, and trial
board process, the chief may impose an emergency suspension with or without pay if the
chief determines that such a suspension is in the best interest of the public.
(2) An emergency suspension without pay under this subsection may not
exceed 30 days.
(3) A police officer who is suspended without pay under this subsection is
entitled to receive back pay if an administrative charging committee determines not to
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0746*

SENATE BILL 746
administratively charge the police officer in connection with the matter on which the
suspension is based.
(b) (1) A chief or a chief’s designee may suspend a police officer without pay
and suspend the police officer’s police powers on an emergency basis if the police officer is
charged with:
(i) a disqualifying crime, as defined in § 5–101 of this article;
(ii) a misdemeanor committed in the performance of duties as a
police officer; or
(iii) a misdemeanor involving dishonesty, fraud, theft, or
misrepresentation.
(2) A police officer who was suspended without pay under this subsection
is entitled to receive back pay if the criminal charge or charges against the police officer
result in:
(i) a finding of not guilty;
(ii) an acquittal;
(iii) a dismissal; or
(iv) a nolle prosequi.
(C) (1) THE CHIEF OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SERVING A
MUNICIPALITY MAY SUSPEND A POLICE OFFICER WITHOUT PAY DURING THE
PENDENCY OF AN APPEAL FROM THE DECISION OF A TRIAL BOARD UNDER § 3–106
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A POLICE OFFICER WHO WAS SUSPENDED WITHOUT PAY UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION IS ENTITLED TO RECEIVE FULL BACK PAY IF THE OFFICER
PREVAILS ON APPEAL.
[(c)] (D) (1) The chief shall terminate the employment of a police officer who
is convicted of a felony.
(2) The chief may terminate the employment of a police officer who:
(i) receives a probation before judgment for a felony; or
(ii) is convicted of:

SENATE BILL 746 3
1. a misdemeanor committed in the performance of duties as
a police officer;
2. misdemeanor second degree assault; or
3. a misdemeanor involving dishonesty, fraud, theft, or
misrepresentation.
[(d)] (E) (1) In connection with a disciplinary matter under this subtitle, a
police officer may be required to submit to blood alcohol tests, blood, breath, or urine tests
for controlled dangerous substances, polygraph examinations, or interrogations that
specifically relate to the subject matter of the investigation.
(2) If a police officer is required to submit to a test, examination, or
interrogation under paragraph (1) of this subsection and the police officer refuses to do so,
the law enforcement agency may commence an action that may lead to a punitive measure
as a result of the refusal.
(3) (i) If a police officer is required to submit to a test, examination, or
interrogation under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the results of the test, examination,
or interrogation are not admissible or discoverable in a criminal proceeding against the
police officer.
(ii) If a police officer is required to submit to a polygraph
examination under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the results of the polygraph
examination are not admissible or discoverable in a criminal or civil proceeding against the
police officer.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.